Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-727
Claims; disallowance; appeal to district court; procedure.

When the claim of any person against the city, except a tort claim as defined in section 13-903, is disallowed in whole or in part by the council, such person may appeal from the decision of the city council to the district court of the same county by causing a written notice to be served on the city clerk within twenty days after making such decision and executing a bond to such city, with good and sufficient sureties to be approved by the city clerk, conditioned for the faithful prosecution of such appeal and the payment of all costs that may be adjudged against the appellant.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 38, p. 240;

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 6, p. 236;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 109;

R.S.1913, § 4991;

C.S.1922, § 4160;

C.S.1929, § 16-722;

R.S.1943, § 16-727;

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 22, p. 635.

Plaintiff failed to file a petition in district court within 50 days of denial of his claim, and therefore, became nonsuited. Fisher v. City of Grand Island, 239 Neb. 929, 479 N.W.2d 772 (1992).